Hawaii statutes.
[PART
III.] PLASTIC CONTAINER CODING

[§342H-41] Definitions. As used in
this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Label" means a molded imprint or
raised symbol on or near the bottom of a plastic product.

"Plastic" means any material made of
polymeric organic compounds and additives that can be shaped by flow.

"Plastic bottle" means a plastic
container intended for single use that has a neck that is smaller than the body
of the container, accepts a screw-type, snap cap, or other closure and has a
capacity of sixteen fluid ounces or more, but less than five gallons.

"Rigid plastic container" means any
formed or molded container, other than a bottle, intended for single use,
composed predominantly of plastic resin, and having a relatively inflexible
finite shape or form with a capacity of eight ounces or more, but less than
five gallons. [L 1990, c 318, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"Part" substituted for "chapter".

Cross References

Plastic connecting devices prohibition, see §339-22.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next